Massachusetts, session 194th, H3236.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 59, Section 5, subsection 41C is hereby amended by striking out the words:
“A city, by vote of its council and approval of its mayor, or a town, by vote of town
meeting, may adjust the following factors contained in these provisions by: 1) reducing the
requisite age of eligibility to any person age 65 years or older; 2) increasing either or both of the
amounts contained in the first sentence of this clause, by not more than 100 per cent;” and
replacing with the following new text:
“A city, by vote of its council and approval of its mayor, or a town, by vote of town
meeting, may adjust the following factors contained in these provisions by: 1) reducing the
requisite age of eligibility to any person age 65 years or older; 2) increasing either or both of the
amounts contained in the first sentence of this clause, by not more than 100 per cent, or
increasing the $500 exemption in the first sentence up to $2,000;”
of 1